Utah statutes.
20A-9-807.   Combining voting precincts.
(1)  The county legislative body may combine voting precincts for Utah's
Western States Presidential Primary by following the procedures and
requirements of Section 20A-5-303.
(2)  The county legislative body may not combine voting precincts if the
voting precincts are in different congressional districts as established by
Section 20A-13-102.
